Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 5 JUVENILE CORRECTIONS ACT
§ 20-519B. Determination of competency of juvenile to proceed — Suspension of proceedings — Restoration order — Commitment.

The court shall hold a hearing no later than thirty (30) days after the report of the examiner or evaluation committee is filed pursuant to the provisions of section 20-519A, Idaho Code. At the hearing, the court may receive as evidence the report of the examiner or evaluation committee. In considering whether the juvenile is competent to proceed, the court shall consider the following:

A description of the nature, content, extent and results of the examination and any test that was conducted;

The juvenile’s capacity to understand the charges or allegations against the juvenile;

The juvenile’s capacity to understand the range and nature of possible penalties that may be imposed in the proceedings;

The juvenile’s capacity to understand the adversarial nature of the legal process;

The juvenile’s capacity to disclose to counsel facts pertinent to the proceedings at issue;

Whether the juvenile is able to display appropriate courtroom behavior;

Whether the juvenile is able to receive accurate impressions of the facts about which he or she is examined, is able to appreciate the meaning of an oath to tell the truth and has an understanding of the potential consequences of not telling the truth;

The examiner’s opinion as to the competency of the juvenile as defined in subsection (2) of section 20-519A, Idaho Code.

The weight to be given to each of the factors listed in subsection (1) of this section is discretionary with the court and a determination that the juvenile is or is not competent to proceed may be based on any one (1) or a combination of such factors, which shall be recited in the court’s order regarding competency.

If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the juvenile contests the findings of the report of the examiner or evaluation committee, the court may make the determination on the basis of such report. If a party contests the findings of such report, they shall have the right to cross-examine the qualified psychiatrist or licensed psychologist who prepared and submitted the report and to offer evidence upon this issue. A finding of incompetency shall be based upon a preponderance of the evidence.

If the court finds the juvenile is competent to proceed, the proceedings shall continue without delay.

If the court initially finds that the juvenile is incompetent and there is not a substantial probability that the juvenile will be restored to competency within six (6) months, the court may stay or dismiss the matter. In determining whether to stay or dismiss the matter, the court shall consider all relevant factors including, but not limited to, the seriousness of the alleged offense, resources available to the juvenile and any issues of public safety. Prior to a stay or dismissal of the matter, the court may convene a screening team consisting of representatives from the department of health and welfare, county probation, local school officials, and/or other agencies or persons designated by the court to develop a treatment plan for the juvenile. In developing such treatment plan, the recommendations contained in the competency examination shall be considered to ensure necessary services for the juvenile are put into place. Parents and guardians of the juvenile, if available, shall be included in the screening team and consulted with regard to the plan of treatment. If appropriate, the court may hold a hearing to determine whether proceedings under chapter 24, title 16, or chapter 3 or 4, title 66, Idaho Code, should be instituted. If such proceedings are initiated, the juvenile court may retain jurisdiction over said proceedings.
(6) If the court determines that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, but may be restored to competency within six (6) months, the court shall order a plan of treatment to be developed by the department of health and welfare for the juvenile to undergo efforts at restoration to competency. The court may:

Convene a restoration treatment team to make recommendations on a plan of treatment;

Order any agencies that have treated or had custody of the juvenile to release any pertinent information or records to the department of health and welfare to be used in the development and implementation of the juvenile’s restoration plan;

Order the department of health and welfare, county probation, school officials and the department of juvenile corrections to release all pertinent information regarding the juvenile to the court, the department of health and welfare and any restoration treatment team to be used in the development and implementation of the juvenile’s restoration plan;

Require the parents or guardians of the juvenile, and where appropriate require the juvenile, to allow information pertinent to the restoration treatment plan be released to the department of health and welfare, the court and any restoration treatment team.

(7) If the court determines that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, but may be restored to competency, the court may order a juvenile to participate in the competency restoration program as developed by the department of health and welfare. The purpose of the treatment or training is the restoration of the juvenile’s competency to proceed. In determining the type and location of the competency restoration program and in designating a restoration provider, the department of health and welfare shall identify the least restrictive alternative that is consistent with public safety and consider whether inpatient treatment, residential care or secure confinement is necessary for program participation.

(a) An inpatient or residential or secure detention facility is only appropriate if all available less restrictive alternatives in community settings which would offer an opportunity for improvement of the juvenile’s condition are inappropriate. If the department of health and welfare’s plan of restoration requires the juvenile be placed in an inpatient, residential or secure detention facility, the court shall hold a hearing on whether to order such placement unless the hearing is waived by the juvenile and the juvenile’s parents or guardians. Juveniles charged with only a status offense or multiple status offenses shall not be held in a secure confinement or detention facility for restoration purposes.

(b) The department of health and welfare is responsible for determining the competency restoration program and services. All costs associated with restoration services shall be the responsibility of the parents of the juvenile according to their ability to pay based upon the sliding fee scale established pursuant to section 16-2433, Idaho Code. The financial obligation of the parents shall be determined after consideration of all available payment and funding sources including title XIX of the social security act, as amended, all available third party sources including funding available to the juvenile from other programs, grants or agencies and parent resources according to any order for child support under chapter 10, title 32, Idaho Code. Services shall not be conditioned upon transfer of custody of parental rights.
(8) If a juvenile is determined to be incompetent to proceed but may be restored to competency, the court shall retain jurisdiction of the juvenile for up to six (6) months. A restoration order issued pursuant to this section is valid for six (6) months from the date of the initial finding of incompetency or until one (1) of the following, whichever occurs first:

(a) The restoration program submits a report that the juvenile has become competent to proceed or that there is no substantial probability that the juvenile will regain competency within the period the order is valid;

(b) The charges are dismissed; or

(c) The juvenile reaches twenty-one (21) years of age.

(9) The court may extend the restoration order beyond six (6) months upon a showing of good cause. If the juvenile reaches twenty-one (21) years of age, the matter shall be dismissed. If the court concludes that there is no substantial probability that the juvenile will regain competency within the period the order is valid, then the provisions of subsection (5) of this section shall apply.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-519B, as added by 2011, ch. 178, § 2, p. 505.

§ 20-519C. Restoration reports — Hearings.

A report shall be filed by the restoration provider at least every ninety (90) days or whenever the restoration provider believes the juvenile is competent to proceed or whenever the restoration provider believes there is no substantial probability that the juvenile will regain competency before the expiration of the order to participate in a competency restoration program or fourteen (14) days before expiration of the restoration order.

The court shall hold a review hearing regarding the progress towards competency at least every ninety (90) days while the juvenile participates in a restoration program. The court may consider the restoration provider’s report at the review hearing to assess the juvenile’s progress and to determine whether restoration services should continue.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-519C, as added by 2011, ch. 178, § 3, p. 505.

§ 20-519D. Admissibility of statements by examined or treated juvenile.

A statement made by a juvenile subject to a competency examination or restoration treatment pursuant to section 20-519A or 20-519B, Idaho Code, for the purposes of such examination or treatment shall not be admissible in evidence in any delinquency or criminal proceeding against the juvenile on any issue other than the juvenile’s ability to assist counsel at trial or to form any specific intent which is an element of the crime charged, except that such statements of a juvenile to the examiner, evaluation committee or restoration provider as are relevant for impeachment purposes may be received subject to the usual rules of evidence governing matters of impeachment.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-519D, as added by 2011, ch. 178, § 4, p. 505.

§ 20-520. Sentencing.

Upon the entry of an order finding the juvenile offender is within the purview of the act, the court shall then hold a sentencing hearing in the manner prescribed by the Idaho juvenile rules to determine the sentence that will promote accountability, competency development and community protection. Prior to the entry of an order disposing of the case, other than an order of discharge or dismissal, the court may request and, if requested, shall receive a report containing the results of an inquiry into the home environment, past history, competency development, prevention or out of home placement services provided, and the social, physical and mental condition of the juvenile offender. The court shall not consider or review the report prior to the entry of an order of adjudication. Upon presentation and consideration of the report by the court, the court may proceed to sentence the juvenile offender as follows:

Place the juvenile offender on formal probation for a period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of the order, except the court may place a juvenile offender on formal probation for a period not to exceed the juvenile offender’s twenty-first birthday if the court finds that the juvenile offender has committed a crime of a sexual nature. If a juvenile offender is committed to the Idaho department of juvenile corrections pursuant to paragraph (s) of this subsection, the court may place the juvenile offender on probation from the date of sentencing up to three (3) years past the date of release from custody or the juvenile offender’s twenty-first birthday, whichever occurs first; provided the court shall conduct a review hearing within thirty (30) days following release of the juvenile offender from the department of juvenile corrections in order to determine the conditions and term of such probation;

Sentence the juvenile offender to detention pursuant to this act for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days for each act, omission or status which is prohibited by the federal, state, local or municipal law or ordinance by reason of minority only. The sentence shall not be executed unless the act, omission or status is in violation of 18 U.S.C. 922(x), or the court finds that the juvenile offender has violated the court’s decree imposing the sentence as provided in this subsection.

Commit the juvenile offender to a period of detention, pursuant to this act, for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days for each unlawful or criminal act the juvenile offender is found to have committed, if the unlawful or criminal act would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, or where the juvenile offender has been adjudicated as an habitual status offender;

If the juvenile offender has committed an unlawful or criminal act which would be a felony if committed by an adult, the court may commit the juvenile offender to detention for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days for each unlawful or criminal act;

Whenever a court commits a juvenile offender to a period of detention, the juvenile detention center shall notify the school district where the detention center is located. No juvenile offender who is found to come within the purview of the act for the commission of a status offense shall be sentenced to detention in a jail facility unless an adjudication has been made that the juvenile offender is an habitual status offender;

Commit the juvenile offender to detention and suspend the sentence on specific probationary conditions;

The court may suspend or restrict the juvenile offender’s driving privileges for such periods of time as the court deems necessary, and the court may take possession of the juvenile offender’s driver’s license. The juvenile offender may request restricted driving privileges during a period of suspension, which the court may allow if the juvenile offender shows by a preponderance of evidence that driving privileges are necessary for his employment or for family health needs;

The court may order that the juvenile offender be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist or psychologist, or that he receive other special care, or that he submit to an alcohol or drug evaluation, if needed, and for such purposes may place the juvenile offender in a hospital or other suitable facility;

The court may order that the county probation office authorize a comprehensive substance abuse assessment of the juvenile offender. After receiving the comprehensive substance abuse assessment, and upon a finding by the court that treatment will provide a cost-effective means of achieving the sentencing goals of accountability, competency development and community protection, the court may order that the juvenile offender receive immediate treatment for substance abuse in keeping with a plan of treatment approved by the court. The initial cost of the assessment and treatment shall be borne by the department of juvenile corrections with funds allocated to the county probation office. The director of the department of juvenile corrections may promulgate rules consistent with this paragraph to establish a schedule of fees to be charged to parents by the county probation office for such services based upon the cost of the services and the ability of parents to pay;

In support of an order under the provisions of this section, the court may make an additional order setting forth reasonable conditions to be complied with by the parents, the juvenile offender, his legal guardian or custodian, or any other person who has been made a party to the proceedings, including, but not limited to, restrictions on visitation by the parents or one (1) parent, restrictions on the juvenile offender’s associates, occupation and other activities, and requirements to be observed by the parents, guardian or custodian;

The court may make any other reasonable order which is in the best interest of the juvenile offender or is required for the protection of the public, except that no person under the age of eighteen (18) years may be committed to jail, prison or a secure facility which does not meet the standards set forth in section 20-518, Idaho Code, unless jurisdiction over the individual is in the process of being waived or has been waived pursuant to section 20-508 or 20-509, Idaho Code. The court may combine several of the above-listed modes of disposition where they are compatible;

An order under the provisions of this section for probation or placement of a juvenile offender with an individual or an agency may provide a schedule for review of the case by the court;

Order the proceeding expanded or altered to include consideration of the cause pursuant to chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code;

Order the case and all documents and records connected therewith transferred to the magistrate division of the district court for the county where the juvenile offender and/or parents reside if different than the county where the juvenile offender was charged and found to have committed the unlawful or criminal act, for the entry of a dispositional order;

Order such other terms, conditions, care or treatment as appears to the court will best serve the interests of the juvenile offender and the community;

The court shall assess a twenty dollar ($20.00) detention/probation training academy fee against the juvenile offender for every petition filed where there has been an adjudication that the juvenile offender is within the purview of this chapter. All moneys raised pursuant to this paragraph shall be transmitted by the court for deposit in the juvenile corrections fund which is created in section 20-542, Idaho Code;

Additionally, the court shall assess a fee of sixty cents (60¢) per hour of community service against the juvenile offender for every petition filed where there has been an adjudication that the juvenile offender is within the purview of this chapter and the court is ordering community service. Such fee is to be remitted by the court to the state insurance fund for purposes of providing worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service pursuant to this chapter. However, if a county is self-insured and provides worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, then remittance to the state insurance fund is not required;

Additionally, the court may assess a monthly probation supervision fee that shall be an amount not more than the maximum monthly misdemeanor probation supervision fee set forth in section 31-3201D, Idaho Code, per month, or such lesser sum as determined by the administrative judge of the judicial district, against the juvenile offender placed on probation. The amount of the monthly probation supervision fee shall be paid to the clerk of the district court who shall deposit such fee into the county juvenile probation fund, which is hereby created, in each county or, at the option of the board of county commissioners, deposited in the county justice fund to be used for county juvenile probation services. Moneys from this fee may be accumulated from year to year and shall be expended exclusively for county juvenile probation services and related purposes;

Commit the juvenile offender to the legal custody of the department of juvenile corrections for an indeterminate period of time not to exceed the juvenile offender’s nineteenth birthday, unless the custody review board determines that extended time in custody is necessary to address competency development, accountability, and community protection; provided however, that no juvenile offender shall remain in the custody of the department beyond the juvenile offender’s twenty-first birthday. The department shall adopt rules implementing the custody review board and operations and procedures of such board. Juvenile offenders convicted as adults and placed in the dual custody of the department of juvenile corrections and the state board of correction under section 19-2601A, Idaho Code, are under the retained jurisdiction of the court and are not within the purview of the custody review board;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a court may not commit a juvenile offender under the age of ten (10) years to a period of detention or to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections for placement in secure confinement.

When an order is entered pursuant to this section, the juvenile offender shall be transported to the facility or program so designated by the court or the department, as applicable, by the sheriff of the county where the juvenile offender resides or is committed, or by an appointed agent. When committing a juvenile offender to the department, or another entity, the court shall at once forward to the department or entity a certified copy of the order of commitment.

Unless the court determines that an order of restitution would be inappropriate or undesirable, it shall order the juvenile offender or his parents or both to pay restitution to or make whole any victim who suffers an economic loss as a result of the juvenile offender’s conduct in accordance with the standards and requirements of sections 19-5304 and 19-5305, Idaho Code. The amount of restitution which may be ordered by the court shall not be subject to the limitations of section 6-210, Idaho Code. Court-ordered restitution shall be paid prior to any other court-ordered payments unless the court specifically orders otherwise. The clerk of the district court, with the approval of the administrative district judge, may use the procedures set forth in section 19-4708, Idaho Code, for the collection of the restitution.

The court may order the juvenile offender’s parents or custodian to pay the charges imposed by community programs ordered by the court for the juvenile offender, or the juvenile offender’s parents or custodian.

Any parent, legal guardian or custodian violating any order of the court entered against the person under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to contempt proceedings under the provisions of chapter 6, title 7, Idaho Code.

The clerk of the district court, with the approval of the administrative district judge, may use the procedures set forth in section 19-4708, Idaho Code, for the collection of other debts owed to the court by the juvenile offender.

If the court, after notice and hearing, finds that a juvenile offender has violated the court’s decree imposing the sentence under circumstances that bring the violation under the valid court order exception of the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974, as amended, the court may commit the juvenile offender to detention for the period of detention previously imposed at sentencing;

History.

I.C.,§ 20-520, as added by 1996, ch. 301, § 2, p. 989; am. 1996, ch. 301, § 3, p. 989; am. 1996, ch. 359, § 2, p. 1207; am. 1997, ch. 76, § 1, p. 158; am. 1997, ch. 262, § 1, p. 746; am. 1999, ch. 155, § 1, p. 431; am. 2000, ch. 329, § 1, p. 1106; am. 2000, ch. 466, § 1, p. 1444; am. 2001, ch. 15, § 1, p. 17; am. 2002, ch. 73, § 1, p. 160; am. 2002, ch. 97, § 1, p. 265; am. 2002, ch. 309, § 1, p. 880; am. 2007, ch. 308, § 1, p. 862; am. 2008, ch. 41, § 1, p. 96; am. 2009, ch. 102, § 3, p. 312; am. 2009, ch. 154, § 2, p. 449; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 16, p. 39; am. 2012, ch. 257, § 6, p. 709; am. 2015, ch. 87, § 1, p. 213; am. 2015, ch. 113, § 8, p. 281; am. 2019, ch. 219, § 2, p. 662.

§ 20-520A. Dismiss and discharge upon completion of authorized drug, mental health or other authorized problem solving court program.

If a juvenile offender has successfully completed and graduated from an authorized juvenile drug court program, juvenile mental health court program or other authorized problem solving court program and, during any period of probation that may have been served following such graduation, has satisfied the terms or conditions of the probation, the court may, if convinced by the showing made that there is no longer cause for continuing the period of probation, and if it be compatible with the public interest, terminate the juvenile’s sentence, set aside the adjudication of the juvenile offender finding the juvenile offender within the purview of the juvenile corrections act, and finally dismiss the case and discharge the juvenile offender from the jurisdiction of the court. This section shall apply to the cases in which juvenile offenders have been found within the purview of the juvenile corrections act before the effective date of this section, as well as to cases that arise on or after the effective date of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-520A, as added by 2014, ch. 345, § 2, p. 865.

§ 20-521. Habitual status offender.

Any juvenile offender who has been adjudicated for commission of two (2) status offenses within twelve (12) months may be charged, petitioned and adjudicated as an habitual status offender for the third status offense committed within that twelve (12) month period.

The court may utilize any dispositional alternative for an habitual status offender that is detailed in section 20-520, Idaho Code, except that the juvenile offender shall not be placed in an Idaho juvenile correctional center.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1814A, as added by 1984, ch. 81, § 11, p. 148; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 22, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 17, p. 39.

§ 20-522. Jurisdiction over parents.

Whenever a juvenile offender is found to come under the purview of this chapter, the court shall have jurisdiction and authority to have the juvenile offender and the juvenile offender’s parent(s), legal guardian or custodian sign a probationary contract with the court containing terms and conditions that the juvenile offender and the juvenile offender’s parent(s), legal guardian or custodian must adhere to as a condition of the juvenile offender’s probation. The probationary contract may provide that upon a violation or breach of the terms and conditions of the probationary contract, the juvenile offender’s parent(s), legal guardian or custodian shall be liable to the court for a specific monetary sum not in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the breach of contract. All such moneys shall be payable to the court and shall be in addition to any other fines, penalties or other sanctions provided by law. Any moneys received by the court pursuant to this section shall be paid into the juvenile corrections fund created in section 20-542, Idaho Code. In lieu of or in addition to a monetary payment, the court may order that the parent(s), legal guardian or custodian attend parenting classes or undergo other treatment or counseling. Any person violating any order of the court entered under the provisions of this section shall be subject to contempt proceedings under the provisions of chapter 6, title 7, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1814B, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 6, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 23, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 7, p. 925; am. 1996, ch. 359, § 3, p. 1207; am. 2001, ch. 15, § 2, p. 17; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 18, p. 39.

§ 20-523. Screening teams to provide assistance to court.

In order to provide assistance to a court in making a disposition pursuant to section 20-520, Idaho Code, a screening team composed of a county probation officer or other investigation officer or agency designated by the court may meet and provide a written recommendation delineating options to the court for disposition of the case pursuant to this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1814C, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 7, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 24, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 8, p. 925.

§ 20-524. Support of juvenile or juvenile offender — Reimbursement for costs incurred.

Whenever a juvenile or juvenile offender is placed by the court in custody other than that of his or her parents or custodian, after due notice to the parent or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the juvenile or juvenile offender, and after a hearing, the court may order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay in such a manner as the court may direct a reasonable sum that will cover in whole or in part the support and treatment of the juvenile or juvenile offender. If the parent or other legally obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against him for contempt, or the order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment.

If the juvenile or juvenile offender is detained, the court may order that the parents of the juvenile or juvenile offender or other legally obligated person contribute to the costs of detention in an amount to be set by the court. The order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment. It is the intent of the legislature that foster parents or a parent or legal guardian receiving public assistance relating to that juvenile or juvenile offender should not benefit from the continued receipt of payments or public assistance from any state or federal agency while the juvenile or juvenile offender is detained. The department of health and welfare is directed to promulgate a rule implementing this intent.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1815, as added by 1984, ch. 81, § 12, p. 148; am. 1986, ch. 222, § 9, p. 593; am. 1990, ch. 361, § 5, p. 973; am. 1992, ch. 194, § 1, p. 603; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 25, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 354, § 1, p. 1198; am. 1997, ch. 82, § 2, p. 192; am. 1998, ch. 292, § 4, p. 928; am. 2004, ch. 50, § 3, p. 236; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 19, p. 39; am. 2012, ch. 257, § 7, p. 709.

§ 20-524A. Department’s payment of detention costs.

If the juvenile offender is committed to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections pursuant to chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code, the department shall reimburse the county for the period of time in excess of five (5) calendar days during which the juvenile offender is housed at a detention center. This time period shall begin to run on the first business day the department receives a copy of the order of commitment, executed by the court. Orders received by the department after 3 o’clock p.m., mountain standard time, on a business day, will be considered to have been received the next business day. Facsimile transmissions of the order are acceptable.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-524A, as added by 2004, ch. 50, § 4, p. 236; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 20, p. 39.

§ 20-525. Records — Privileged information.

The court shall maintain records of all cases brought before it. In proceedings under this act the following juvenile courtroom proceedings and records shall be open to the public: all proceedings against a juvenile offender of the age of fourteen (14) years or older and who is petitioned or charged with an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult including the court docket, petitions, complaints, information, arraignments, trials, sentencings, probation violation hearings and dispositions, motions and other papers filed in any case in any district; transcripts of testimony taken by the court; and findings, verdicts, judgments, orders, decrees and other papers filed in proceedings before the court of any district.

Juvenile courtroom proceedings and records shall remain confidential when the court and the prosecutor agree extraordinary circumstances exist that justify records of a juvenile offender of the age of fourteen (14) years or older and who is petitioned or charged with an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult should remain confidential because it is in the best interest of the juvenile offender.

In proceedings under this act the following records and court proceedings of juvenile offenders of the age of thirteen (13) years or younger shall not be withheld from public inspection, except on court order, which order must be made in writing in each case: the court docket, petitions, complaints, information, arraignments, trials, sentencings, probation violation hearings and dispositions, motions and other papers filed in any case in any district; transcripts of testimony taken by the court; and findings, verdicts, judgments, orders, decrees and other papers filed in proceedings before the court of any district.

These records shall be open to inspection according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. All information obtained and social records prepared in the discharge of official duty by an employee of the court shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

The victim of misconduct shall always be entitled to the name of the juvenile offender involved, the name of the juvenile offender’s parents or guardian, and their addresses and telephone numbers, if available in the records of the court.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this act and notwithstanding any order entered pursuant hereto, nothing in this act shall prohibit the exchange of records created pursuant to this act between prosecuting attorneys or courts in this state.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 16, p. 876; am. 1977, ch. 156, § 4, p. 399; am. 1990, ch. 213, § 12, p. 480; 1990, ch. 245, § 2, p. 696; am. 1994, ch. 326, § 2, p. 1046; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 26, p. 65; am. 1997, ch. 258, § 1, p. 732; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 21, p. 39; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 26, p. 379.

§ 20-525A. Expungement of record — Hearing — Findings necessary — Special index — Effect of order.

Any person who has been adjudicated in a case under this act and found to be within the purview of the act for having committed a felony offense or having been committed to the department of juvenile corrections may, after the expiration of five (5) years from the date of termination of the continuing jurisdiction of the court, or, in case the juvenile offender was committed to the juvenile correctional center, five (5) years from the date of his release from the juvenile correctional center, or after reaching age eighteen (18) years, whichever occurs last, petition the court for the expungement of his record. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the pendency of the petition and of the date of the hearing. The prosecuting attorney and any other person who may have relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing.

Any person who has been adjudicated in a case under this act and found to be within the purview of the act for having committed misdemeanor or status offenses only and not having been committed to the department of juvenile corrections may, after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of termination of the continuing jurisdiction of the court or after reaching age eighteen (18) years, whichever occurs later, petition the court for the expungement of his record. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the pendency of the petition and the date of the hearing. The prosecuting attorney and any other person who may have relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing.

In any case where the prosecuting attorney has elected to utilize the diversion process or the court orders an informal adjustment pursuant to section 20-511, Idaho Code, the person may, after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of termination of the continuing jurisdiction of the court or after reaching age eighteen (18) years, whichever occurs later, petition the court for the expungement of his record. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the pendency of the petition and the date of the hearing. The prosecuting attorney and any other person who may have relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing.

The court may not expunge a conviction for any of the following crimes from a juvenile offender’s record:

Administering poison with intent to kill (18-4014, Idaho Code);

Aggravated battery (18-907, Idaho Code);

Armed robbery (chapter 65, title 18, Idaho Code);

Arson (chapter 8, title 18, Idaho Code);

Assault with intent to commit a serious felony (18-909, Idaho Code);

Assault with intent to murder (18-4015, Idaho Code);

Assault or battery upon certain personnel, felony (18-915, Idaho Code);

Forcible sexual penetration by use of a foreign object (18-6608, Idaho Code);

Infamous crime against nature, committed by force or violence (18-6605, Idaho Code);

Injury to child, felony (18-1501, Idaho Code);

Kidnapping (18-4501, Idaho Code);

Murder of any degree (18-4001 and 18-4003, Idaho Code);

Rape, excluding statutory rape (18-6101, Idaho Code);

Ritualized abuse of a child (18-1506A, Idaho Code);

Sexual exploitation of a child (18-1507, Idaho Code);

Unlawful use of destructive device or bomb (18-3320, Idaho Code);

Voluntary manslaughter (18-4006 1., Idaho Code);

A violation of the provisions of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), (B) or (C), Idaho Code, when the violation occurred on or within one thousand (1,000) feet of the property of any public or private primary or secondary school, or in those portions of any building, park, stadium or other structure or grounds which were, at the time of the violation, being used for an activity sponsored by or through such a school;

A violation of the provisions of section 37-2732B, Idaho Code, related to drug trafficking or manufacturing of illegal drugs.

If the court finds after hearing that the petitioner has not been adjudicated as a juvenile offender for any of the crimes identified in subsection (4) of this section, and has not been convicted of a felony, or of a misdemeanor wherein violence toward another person was attempted or committed since the termination of the court’s jurisdiction or his release from the juvenile correctional center, and that no proceeding involving such felony or misdemeanor is pending or being instituted against him, and if the court further finds to its satisfaction that the petitioner has been held accountable, is developing life skills necessary to become a contributing member of the community and that the expungement of the petitioner’s record will not compromise public safety, it shall order all records in the petitioner’s case in the custody of the court and all such records, including law enforcement investigatory reports and fingerprint records, in the custody of any other agency or official sealed; and shall further order all references to said adjudication, diversion or informal adjustment removed from all indices and from all other records available to the public. However, a special index of the expungement proceedings and records shall be kept by the court ordering expungement, which index shall not be available to the public and shall be revealed only upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order. Upon the entry of the order the proceedings in the petitioner’s case shall be deemed never to have occurred and the petitioner may properly reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter. Inspection of the records may thereafter be permitted only by the court upon petition by the person who is the subject of the records, or by any other court of competent jurisdiction, and only to persons named in the petition.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1618A, as added by 1969, ch. 299, § 1, p. 899; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 277, § 9, p. 925; am. 1999, ch. 248, § 1, p. 636; am. 2004, ch. 160, § 1, p. 525; am. 2005, ch. 92, § 1, p. 311; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 22, p. 39; am. 2016, ch. 296, § 14, p. 828.